Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,105
Motor vehicles owned or operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts; distinctive plates or undercover license plates.

(1) The department may provide a distinctive license plate for all motor vehicles owned or operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts. Motor vehicles owned or operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts shall display such distinctive license plates when such license plates are issued or shall display undercover license plates when such license plates are issued under section 60-3,135.

(2) Any motor vehicle owned or leased and used by any city or village of this state, any rural fire protection district, the Civil Air Patrol, any public school district, any county, the state, the United States Government, any entity formed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Joint Public Agency Act, or any municipal public body or authority used in operating a public passenger transportation system, and exempt from a distinct marking as provided in section 81-1021, may carry license plates the same design and size as are provided in subsection (1) of this section or undercover license plates issued under section 60-3,135.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 105.

Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, see section 13-2001.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.